Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.300.845

Media literacy and digital citizenship—Regional conferences. (Expires July 31, 2031.)

(1) Subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this specific purpose, the office of the superintendent of public instruction shall convene two regional conferences on the subject of media literacy and digital citizenship.

(2) The conferences in this section should highlight the work performed by the recipients of the grant program established under RCW 28A.300.840, as well as best practices in media literacy and digital citizenship.

(3) The locations for conferences convened under this section must include one site in western Washington and one site in eastern Washington.

(4) This section expires July 31, 2031.

[ 2021 c 301 s 7.]

NOTES:

Finding—Purpose—2021 c 301: See note following RCW 28A.650.060.